Utah statutes.
41-6a-604.   Maximum speed in a school zone -- Penalty -- Minimum fines -- Compensatory service -- Waiver -- Recordkeeping.

(1)  A person may not operate a vehicle at a speed greater than 20 miles per hour in a reduced speed school zone as defined in Section 41-6a-303.

(2) (a)  A violation of Subsection (1) is a class C misdemeanor and the minimum fine:

(i)  for a first offense shall be calculated according to the following schedule:

 



Vehicle Speed

Minimum Fine

 



21 - 29 MPH



$   50

 



30 - 39 MPH



$ 125

 



40 MPH and greater



$ 125

(ii)  for a second and subsequent offense within three years of a previous conviction or bail forfeiture shall be calculated according to the following schedule:

 



Vehicle Speed

Minimum Fine

 



21 - 29 MPH



$   50

 



30 - 39 MPH



$ 225

 



40 MPH and greater



$ 525

(b) (i)  Except as provided under Subsection (2)(a)(ii), the court may order the person to perform compensatory service in lieu of the fine or any portion of the fine.

(ii)  The court shall order the person to perform compensatory service observing a crossing guard if the conviction is for a:

(A)  first offense with a vehicle speed of 30 miles per hour or more; or

(B)  second and subsequent offense within three years of a previous conviction or bail forfeiture.

(iii)  The court may waive the compensatory service required under Subsection (2)(b)(ii) if the court makes the reasons for the waiver part of the record.

(3)  The Driver License Division shall develop and implement a record system to distinguish:

(a)  a conviction or bail forfeiture under this section from other convictions; and

(b)  between a first and subsequent conviction or bail forfeiture under this section.

(4)  The provisions of this section take precedence over the provisions of Sections 41-6a-601, 41-6a-602, 41-6a-603, and 76-3-301.

